lexc-files/prs-num/negative-future-optative.txt
!=========================================
LEXICON IntrOptFutNEG
!  person/number markers for
!    intransitive future negative optative
!=========================================
|-------------------|
^[2Sg]:^ng  Enclitic;
^[2Pl]:^si  Enclitic;
^[2Du]:^tek Enclitic;
|-------------------|

!=======================================
LEXICON TrnsOptFutNEG
!  person/number markers for
!    transitive future negative optative
!=======================================
|-----------------------|--------------------------|----------------------------|
^[2Sg.3Sg]:^an  Enclitic; ^[2Sg.3Pl]:^ki   Enclitic; ^[2Sg.3Du]:^kek    Enclitic;
^[2Pl.3Sg]:^an  Enclitic; ^[2Pl.3Pl]:^ki   Enclitic; ^[2Pl.3Du]:^kek    Enclitic;
^[2Du.3Sg]:^an  Enclitic; ^[2Du.3Pl]:^ki   Enclitic; ^[2Du.3Du]:^kek    Enclitic;
|-----------------------|--------------------------|----------------------------|
^[2Sg.1Sg]:^nga Enclitic; ^[2Sg.1Pl]:^amta Enclitic; ^[2Sg.1Du]:^amtung Enclitic;
^[2Pl.1Sg]:^nga Enclitic; ^[2Pl.1Pl]:^amta Enclitic; ^[2Pl.1Du]:^amtung Enclitic;
^[2Du.1Sg]:^nga Enclitic; ^[2Du.1Pl]:^amta Enclitic; ^[2Du.1Du]:^amtung Enclitic;
|-----------------------|--------------------------|----------------------------|
^[2Sg.2Sg]:^ng  Enclitic; ^[2Sg.2Pl]:^si   Enclitic; ^[2Sg.2Du]:^tek    Enclitic;
^[2Pl.2Sg]:^ng  Enclitic; ^[2Pl.2Pl]:^si   Enclitic; ^[2Pl.2Du]:^tek    Enclitic;
^[2Du.2Sg]:^ng  Enclitic; ^[2Du.2Pl]:^si   Enclitic; ^[2Du.2Du]:^tek    Enclitic;
|-----------------------|--------------------------|----------------------------|
